Wyoming, session 2026, HB0052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xlii), 22-8-102,
22-8-108(a), (c), (d) and by creating a new subsection (e),
22-14-114(a), 22-16-109(a) through (c) and by creating new
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
subsections (d) through (g), 22-16-110(a)(intro),
22-16-111(a)(intro), (i), (ii) and (b) and 22-16-113(a)(i),
(ii), (b) and (c) are amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xlii) "Recount" is the counting of ballots by
hand or the processing of ballots through the tabulation
system for an additional time or times, conducted for the
specific purpose of counting votes again in any specific
race, based upon the criteria of W.S. 22-16-109 or
22-16-111 through 22-16-113;

22-8-102. Qualifications.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, judges of
election and members of counting boards shall be registered
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
electors and shall be physically, morally and mentally
competent to perform their duties. The county clerk may
appoint persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age
to serve as judges of election or members of counting
boards if such persons meet all other requirements for
qualification of an elector. A judge of election shall not
be a member of a counting board at the same election except
as provided by W.S. 22-8-108(d) and (e).

22-8-108. Appointment, composition and authority of
counting boards; when judges to count.

(a) Unless ballots are tabulated by electronic voting
systems, the county clerk shall appoint a counting board
for each paper ballot polling place casting more than three
hundred (300) votes at the last general election, and may
appoint a counting board in such a polling place in which
one hundred fifty (150) or more such votes were cast at
such election. A counting board shall have three (3)
members or more to facilitate the counting of votes. No
more than one (1) person under the age of eighteen (18) may
be appointed as to each counting board.

HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
(c) The counting board in a paper ballot polling
place appointed under subsection (a) of this section has no
authority to act until polls are declared closed as
provided in W.S. 22-13-117, except as provided in W.S.
22-9-125(d). A counting board in an electronic voting
system counting center may commence preparing absentee
ballots for counting at any time on election day, or before
election day as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d).

(d) For a polling place where a counting board need
not be appointed under subsection (a) of this section, the
judges of election shall count the votes. This subsection
shall not apply if ballots are tabulated by electronic
voting system.

(e) The county clerk shall appoint a counting board
for the purposes of completing recounts as provided in W.S.
22-16-109. The counting board under this subsection shall
consist of not less than three (3) members. Additional
counting board members may be appointed if deemed necessary
by the county clerk.

22-14-114. Counting of ballots.
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044

(a) The following shall apply to the counting of
ballots:

(i) For ballots designed to be counted by
machine, each individual vote shall be determined by the
voting equipment and shall not be determined subjectively
by human tabulation except as provided below:

(A) When the intent of the voter is
unmistakable but the ballot was received in such damaged,
soiled, or other condition that it is rejected by the
machine. The secretary of state may promulgate rules
establishing standards for counting such ballots;.

(B) When being recounted by hand in
accordance with W.S. 22-16-109. The secretary of state may
promulgate rules establishing standards for counting such
ballots;

(C) When counting write-in votes by
candidate under W.S. 22-16-103(a)(iii).

HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
(ii) For ballots not designed to be counted by
machine, only votes clearly marked, as provided by W.S.
22-14-104 and rules promulgated pursuant to this code,
shall be tallied;.

(iii) For write-in votes, names which are
misspelled or abbreviated or the use of nicknames of
candidates shall be counted for the candidate if the vote
is obvious to the board.

22-16-109. Recounts.

(a) The county canvassing board shall make a recount
of precinct votes if it appears to the board that a recount
is required due to irregularities in that precinct. The
recount under this subsection may be conducted by a hand
count or by using electronic voting equipment as determined
by the county canvassing board.

(b) Prior to the county canvass, there shall be a
recount made of all the votes:

HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
(i) Cast for any federal, statewide or
legislative office in which the difference in number of
votes cast for the winning candidate receiving the least
number of votes and the number of votes cast for the losing
candidate receiving the greatest number of votes is less
than one percent (1%) two percent (2%) of the number of
votes cast for the winning candidate receiving the least
number of votes cast for that office in that county. This
recount shall be made in the entire district in which the
candidates are standing for election in that county. This
recount shall be conducted by a hand count. A recount under
this subsection shall not be required if a recount is
required under paragraph (ii) of this subsection for the
same office;

(ii) Cast for any federal, statewide or
legislative office in which the difference in the number of
votes cast for the winning candidate receiving the least
number of votes and the number of votes cast for the losing
candidate receiving the greatest number of votes is less
than one percent (1%) of the number of votes cast for the
winning candidate receiving the least number of votes cast
for that office in the entire state or district. This
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
recount shall be made in each county in which the
candidates are standing for election. This recount shall be
conducted by a hand count;

(iii) Cast for any other office not specified in
paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection in which the
difference in number of votes cast for the winning
candidate receiving the least number of votes and the
number of votes cast for the losing candidate receiving the
greatest number of votes is less than two percent (2%) of
the number of votes cast for the winning candidate
receiving the least number of votes cast for that office.
This recount shall be made in the entire district in which
the candidates are standing for election. This recount
shall be conducted by electronic voting equipment.

(c) There shall be a recount made of all the votes
cast for any office if a losing candidate requests one
under provision of W.S. 22-16-110. This recount shall be
made in the entire district in which the candidate is
standing for election. This recount may be conducted by
hand count or by using electronic voting equipment as
determined by the candidate.
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044

(d) Not later than the day following an election, the
secretary of state may require a recount of not more than
one (1) federal, statewide or legislative question or race.
The secretary of state shall specify which precincts are to
be recounted. This recount may be conducted by hand or by
using electronic voting equipment as specified by the
secretary of state.

(e) The county clerk shall have the discretion to
recount any ballot proposition or race either by election
district or precinct. This recount may be conducted by hand
or by using electronic voting equipment as specified by the
county clerk.

(f) If there is any discrepancy between the recount
results and the preliminary election results, the county
canvassing board shall determine the official result of the
election.

(g) There is created the election recount account.
Funds in the account shall not revert and are continuously
appropriated to the secretary of state for costs related to
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
administering hand recounts. The state treasurer shall
invest funds within the account in accordance with law. All
investment earnings from the account shall be deposited in
the general fund.

22-16-110. How candidate may obtain recount; where
affidavit filed.

(a) A candidate may obtain a recount of votes for the
office he is seeking by making and filing an affidavit
alleging that fraud or error occurred in counting,
returning or canvassing the votes cast in any part of the
district in which he is standing for election. The
affidavit shall specify whether the recount should be
conducted using electronic voting equipment or by hand
count using tally sheets. The affidavit shall be filed in
the same office the candidate filed his application for
nomination:

22-16-111. Recount of ballot proposition.

(a) A recount of votes of a ballot proposition may be
obtained in one (1) of the following manners as follows:
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044

(i) A recount will be made:

(A) If the proposition is a statewide
proposition and receives a number of votes, greater or
lesser, within one percent (1%) of the number of votes
required for passage. The one percent (1%) variance shall
be calculated based upon the total number of votes cast on
the proposition, except for constitutional amendments in
which case the variance shall be calculated based upon the
total number of votes cast in the election. This recount
shall be conducted by a hand count;

(B) If the ballot proposition is not a
statewide ballot proposition and the proposition receives a
number of votes, greater or lesser, within two percent (2%)
of the number of votes required for passage. This recount
shall be conducted by a hand count.

(ii) A recount will be made if requested in an
affidavit signed by twenty-five (25) electors registered in
a district voting on the question. The affidavit shall be
filed with the county clerk not later than two (2) days
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
after the county canvass has been completed for
propositions voted on in one (1) county, and with the
secretary of state not later than two (2) days after the
state canvass has been completed for propositions voted on
in more than one (1) county. The affidavit shall be
accompanied by a deposit of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
as specified in W.S. 22-16-113(a). The affidavit shall
specify whether the recount should be conducted by hand
count or by electronic voting equipment.

(b) The county in which the recount is taken shall
pay the costs of the recount if the recount is required by
subsection paragraph (a)(i) of this section; and the
signers of the affidavit referred to in subsection
paragraph (a)(ii) of this section shall be jointly and
severally liable for the costs of the recount requested by
them up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per county
recounted if the results of the election are not changed by
the recount.

22-16-113. Recount deposit; expense of recount.

HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
(a) An affidavit requesting a recount must be
accompanied by the following deposit:

(i) If the difference in number of votes cast as
calculated pursuant to W.S. 22-16-109(b) is one percent
(1%) or greater but less than five percent (5%), five
hundred dollars ($500.00) affidavit requests the recount be
conducted by electronic voting equipment, an amount
determined by the county clerk not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00);

(ii) If the difference in number of votes cast
as calculated pursuant to W.S. 22-16-109(b) is five percent
(5%) or greater, three thousand dollars ($3,000.00)
affidavit requests the recount be conducted by hand count,
an amount determined by the county clerk not to exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

(b) If the recount shows sufficient error to change
the result of the election, the county in which the recount
is taken shall pay expenses of the recount and the deposit
shall be returned. Otherwise the applicant or applicants
seeking the recount shall be liable for the actual cost of
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
conducting the recount up to a maximum of the amount
deposited under subsection (a) of this section, per county
recounted. Every county clerk shall issue a complete
accounting of all costs of the recount to the candidate
requesting the recount, and shall refund any surplus to the
candidate. If the actual cost of conducting the recount
exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), the county clerk
may seek reimbursement of reasonable expenses from the
secretary of state. Reasonable expenses are limited to
market facility rental fees, excluding facility rental fees
for facilities owned by the county or the state, wages at a
rate consistent with the compensation under W.S. 22-8-116,
per diem of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day and
mileage for election judges and county clerk staff. The
secretary of state shall reimburse those reasonable
expenses from the election recount account. If requesting
reimbursement from the secretary of state, the county clerk
shall provide a complete accounting of all costs of the
recount and the deposit paid by the candidate.

(c) If the recount is initiated by the county clerk
or county canvassing board or required by W.S.
22-16-109(b), the cost of the recount shall be paid by the
HB0052

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0044
county in which the recount is taken regardless of the
result of the recount. If the recount is initiated by the
secretary of state under W.S. 22-16-109(d), the cost of the
recount shall be paid by the secretary of state regardless
of the result of the recount.

Section 2. W.S. 22-8-108(b) and 22-16-111(c) are
repealed.

Section 3. There is appropriated two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the election
recount account under W.S. 22-16-109(g), as created by
section 1 of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0052